Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201269-1307.06
Military medal; report and delivery
to State Treasurer.

Any military medal that is removed from a safe deposit box
or any other safekeeping repository or agency or collateral deposit box on
which the lease or rental period has expired due to nonpayment of rental charges
or other reasons shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of but shall be retained
by the holder for the lessee of the box until reported and delivered to the
State Treasurer in accordance with this section. Such report shall be made
in compliance with section 69-1310. The holder shall, at the time of filing
the report and with the report, deliver the military medal to the State Treasurer
for safekeeping by the State Treasurer in accordance with section 69-1307.07.

Laws 2012, LB819, § 2.
July 19, 2012